Washington statutes.
RCW 17.04.200

Violation of rules and regulations—Notice to destroy weeds—Destruction.

(1) If the weed inspector, or the board of directors, shall find that the rules and regulations of the weed district are not being carried out on any one or more parcels of land within such district, the weed inspector shall give forthwith a notice in writing, on a form to be prescribed by the directors, to the owners, tenants, mortgagees, and occupants, or to the accredited resident agent of any nonresident owner of such lands within the district whereon noxious weeds are standing, being or growing and in danger of going to seed, requiring him or her to cause the same to be cut down, otherwise destroyed or eradicated on such lands in the manner and within the time specified in the notice, such time, however, not to exceed seven days. It shall be the duty of the county auditor and county treasurer to make available to the weed inspector lists of owners, tenants, and mortgagees of lands within such district;

(2) If a resident agent of any nonresident owner of lands where noxious weeds are found standing, being, or growing cannot be found, the local weed inspector shall post said notice in the form provided by the directors in three conspicuous places on said land, and in addition to posting said notice the local weed inspector shall, at the same time mail a copy thereof by registered or certified mail with return receipt requested to the owner of such nonresident lands, if his or her post office address is known or can be ascertained by said inspector from the last tax list in the county treasurer's office, and it shall be the duty of the treasurer to furnish such lists upon request by the weed inspector. Proof of such serving, posting, and mailing of notice by the weed inspector shall be made by affidavit forthwith filed in the office of the county auditor and it shall be the duty of the county auditor to accept and file such affidavits;

(3) If the weeds are not cut down, otherwise destroyed, or eradicated within the time specified in said notice, the local weed inspector shall personally, or with such help as he or she may require, cause the same to be cut down or otherwise destroyed in the manner specified in said notice.

[ 2011 c 336 s 449; 1961 c 250 s 6; 1937 c 193 s 2; 1929 c 125 s 11; RRS s 2778-3. Prior: 1921 c 150 s 9, part.]